Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-1204
Petition on appeal; time for filing; indigency.

(1) The party appealing an order or decision as provided in section 15-1201 shall file a petition within thirty days after the date the transcript is filed in the district court.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, satisfaction of the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of section 15-1202 and subsection (1) of this section shall perfect the appeal and give the district court jurisdiction of the matter appealed.

(3) Indigency shall be determined by the district court having jurisdiction of the appeal upon motion of the appellant before the court considers any other matter relating to the appeal. The court shall make a reasonable inquiry to determine the appellant's financial condition and shall consider such factors as the appellant's income, the availability to the appellant of other resources, including real and personal property, bank accounts, social security benefits, and unemployment or other benefits, the appellant's normal living expenses, the appellant's outstanding debts, the number and age of the appellant's dependents, and other relevant circumstances. If the appellant is deemed to be indigent, the satisfaction of the requirements of subsections (1) and (3) of section 15-1202 and subsection (1) of this section shall perfect the appeal and give the district court jurisdiction of the matter appealed.

Laws 1969, c. 65, § 4, p. 378;

Laws 1983, LB 52, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 19;

Laws 2009, LB441, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 166.